Washington statutes.
RCW 2.72.060

Office to provide decision-making assistance services, navigator service, and trainings for decision makers and professional guardians.

(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office shall contract with public or private entities or individuals to provide decision-making assistance services, prioritizing persons who are:

(a) Age 18 or older whose income does not exceed 400 percent of the federal poverty level determined annually by the United States department of health and human services or who are eligible to receive long-term care services through the Washington state department of social and health services;

(b) In an acute care hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, a psychiatric hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, or a state psychiatric hospital licensed under chapter 72.23 RCW, or in a location funded by such a hospital;

(c) Medically ready for discharge, or will soon be medically ready for discharge, to a postacute care or community setting; and

(d) Without a qualified person who is willing and able to serve as a decision maker.

(2) For decision-making assistance services provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the office shall establish a streamlined process to review requests for decision-making assistance for persons who meet the requirement in subsection (1) of this section on a weekly basis.

(3) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office shall establish a navigator service to provide assistance and support for hospitals and persons in hospitals, including assistance to navigate options for guardianship, public conservatorship, decision-making assistance, and estate administration services as appropriate for the person.

(4) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office shall fund training for decision makers regarding considerations for specific populations, including behavioral health, involuntary treatment, disability, family law, and medicaid programs.

(5) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office shall offer low-barrier trainings to certified professional guardians on topics such as aging, mental health, and dementia.

[ 2024 c 267 s 15.]